Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.420

Nonresident pharmacies—Information confidential—Exceptions.

All records, reports, and information obtained by the department from or on behalf of an entity licensed under chapter 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW shall be confidential and exempt from inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW. Nothing in this section restricts the investigation or the proceedings of the commission or the department so long as the commission and the department comply with the provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW. Nothing in this section or in chapter 42.56 RCW shall restrict the commission or the department from complying with any mandatory reporting requirements that exist or may exist under federal law, nor shall the commission or the department be restricted from providing to any person the name of any nonresident pharmacy that is or has been licensed or disciplined under RCW 18.64.350 through 18.64.400.

[ 2013 c 19 s 25; 2005 c 274 s 226; 1991 c 87 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 87: See note following RCW 18.64.350.